Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4701
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-4701 to 44-4727 shall be known and may be cited as the Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 1.